Washington statutes.
RCW 35.07.160

Receiver may sue and be sued.

The receiver shall have the right to sue and be sued in all cases necessary or proper for the purpose of winding up the affairs of the former city or town and shall be subject to suit in all cases wherein the city or town might have been sued, subject to the limitations provided in this chapter.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.07.160. Prior: 1897 c 69 s 12; RRS s 8925.]